Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5127HV (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 2335 Section 1. Section 483A.27, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. A person born after January 1, 1972, shall not obtain a 3 hunting license unless the person has satisfactorily completed 4 a hunter education course approved by the commission. A person 5 who is eleven years of age or more older may enroll in an 6 approved hunter education course, but a person who is eleven 7 years of age and who has successfully completed the course 8 shall be issued a certificate of completion which that becomes 9 valid on the personâs twelfth birthday. A certificate of 10 completion from an approved hunter education course issued in 11 this state, or a certificate issued by another state, country, 12 or province or by a nationally recognized organization for 13 completion of a course that meets the standards adopted by the 14 international hunter education association ââ United States of 15 America, is valid for the requirements of this section . 16 Sec. 2. Section 483A.27, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 17 following new subsection: 18 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. A person may satisfy the hunter 19 education requirements required under this section by 20 completing an online hunter education course offered or 21 approved by the department. Completion of an in-person field 22 day shall not be required for successful completion of the 23 course but may be offered by the department or the person 24 offering the course as an optional supplemental opportunity. 25